en: Strawberry yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко с ягоди
de: Erdbeerjoghurt, Erdbeerjogurt, Erdbeerjoghurts, Erdbeerjogurts
es: Yogures con fresa, yogures de fresa
fi: Mansikkajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la fraise
hr: Jogurti od jagoda
hu: Epres joghurtok
it: Yogurt alla fragola
lt: Braškiniai jogurtai, Jogurtai su braškėmis
nl: Aardbeienyoghurts, Aardbeienyoghurt, Yoghurt met aardbeien, Yoghurts met aardbeien
pl: Jogurty truskawkowe, Jogurt truskawkowy
pt: Iogurtes de morango
ro: Iaurturi cu căpșune

en: Blueberry yogurts
de: Heidelbeer-Joghurt
es: Yogures con arándanos, yogures de arándanos
fi: Mustikkajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la myrtille
hr: Jogurti od borovnice
hu: Áfonyás joghurtok
it: Yogurt al mirtillo
lt: Mėlynių jogurtai, Jogurtai su mėlynėmis
nl: Bosbessenyoghurt, Bosbessenyoghurts, Yoghurt met bosbessen, Yoghurts met bosbessen
pl: Jogurty jagodowe, Jogurt jagodowe
pt: Iogurtes de mirtilo
ro: Iaurturi cu afine

en: Blackberry yogurts
es: Yogures con mora
fr: Yaourts à la mûre
hr: Jogurti od kupina
it: Yogurt al more
lt: Gervuogių jogurtai, Jogurtai su gervuogėmis
pt: Iogurtes de amora
ro: Iaurturi cu mure

en: Mango yogurts
de: Mango-Joghurt
es: Yogures con mango
fi: Mangojogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la mangue
hr: Jogurti od manga
hu: Mangós joghurtok
it: Yogurt al mango
lt: Mangų jogurtai, Jogurtai su mangais
nl: Mangoyoghurts, Mangoyoghurt, Yoghurt met mango, Yoghurts met mango
pt: Iogurtes de manga
ro: Iaurturi cu mango

en: Peach yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко с праскови
de: Pfirsischjoghurt
es: Yogures con melocotón
fi: Persikkajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la pêche
hr: Jogurti od breskve
hu: Barackos joghurtok
it: Yogurt alla pesca
lt: Persikų jogurtai, Jogurtai su persikai
nl: Perzikenyoghurt, Perzikenyoghurts, Perzikyoghurt, Perzikyoghurts, Yoghurt met perzik, Yoghurt met perziken, Yoghurts met perziken
pl: Jogurty brzoskwiniowe, Jogurt brzoskwiniowy
pt: Iogurtes de pêssego
ro: Iaurturi cu piersici
tr: Şeftalili yoğurt
zh: 桃子酸奶

en: Pineapple yogurts
de: Ananas-Joghurt
es: Yogures con piña
fr: Yaourts à l'ananas
hr: Jogurti od ananasa
hu: Ananászos joghurtok
it: Yogurt all'ananas
lt: Ananasų jogurtai, Jogurtai su ananasais
nl: Ananasyoghurt, Ananasyoghurts, Yoghurt met ananas, Yoghurts met ananas
pt: Iogurtes de ananás

en: Cherry yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко с череши
de: Kirschjoghurt
fi: Kirsikkajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la cerise
hr: Jogurti od višanja
hu: Cseresznyés joghurtok
it: Yogurt alla ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių jogurtai, Jogurtai su vyšniomis
nl: Kersenyoghurts, Kersenyoghurt
pt: Iogurtes de cereja
ro: Iaurturi cu cireșe
tr: Kirazlı yoğurt

en: Raspberry yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко с малини
de: Himbeer-Joghurt
es: Yogures con frambuesa, yogures de frambuesa
fi: Vadelmajogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la framboise
hr: Jogurti od malina
hu: Málnás joghurtok
it: Yogurt al lampone
lt: Aviečių jogurtai, Jogurtai su avietėmis
nl: Frambozenyoghurt, Frambozenyoghurts, Yoghurt met framboos, Yoghurt met frambozen, Yoghurts met framboos, Yoghurts met frambozen
pt: Iogurtes de framboesa
ro: Iaurturi cu zmeură

en: Apricot yogurts
de: Aprikosenjoghurt
es: Yogures con albaricoque, yogures de albaricoque
fi: Aprikoosijogurtit
fr: Yaourts à l'abricot
hr: Jogurti od marelice
hu: Sárgabarackos joghurtok
it: Yogurt all'albicocca
lt: Abrikosų jogurtai, Jogurtai su abrikosais
nl: abrikozenyoghurt, Abrikozenyoghurts, Yoghurt met abrikoos, Yoghurt met abrikozen, Yoghurts met abrikoos, Yoghurts met abrikozen
pt: Iogurtes de damasco
ro: Iaurturi cu caise

en: Pear yogurts
de: Birnenjoghurt
es: Yogures con pera
fi: Päärynäjogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la poire
hr: Jogurti od kruške
it: Yogurt alla pera
lt: Kriaušių jogurtai, Jogurtai su kriaušėmis
nl: Perenyoghurt, Perenyoghurts, Yoghurt met peer, Yoghurt met peren
pt: Iogurtes de pera
ro: Iaurturi cu pere

en: Apple yogurts
es: Yogures con manzana
fr: Yaourts à la pomme
hr: Jogurti od jabuka
it: Yogurt alla mela
lt: Obuolių jogurtai, Jogurtai su obuoliais
nl: Appelyoghurt, Appelyoghurts, Yoghurt met appel
pt: Iogurtes de maçã

en: Plum yogurts
es: Yogures con ciruela
fr: Yaourts à la prune
hr: Jogurti od šljiva
it: Yogurt alla prugna, yogurt alla susina
lt: Slyvų jogurtai, Jogurtai su slyvomis
nl: Pruimenyoghurt, Pruimenyoghurts, Yoghurt met pruimen

en: Prune yogurts
es: Yogures con ciruela pasa
fr: Yaourts au pruneau
hr: Jogurti od suhih šljiva
it: Yogurt alla prugna secca
lt: Džiovintų slyvų jogurtai, Jogurtai su džiovintomis slyvomis
nl: Gedroogde pruimenyoghurt, Gedroogde pruimenyoghurts, Yoghurt met gedroogde pruimen

en: Rhubarb yogurts
es: Yogures de ruibarbo
fi: Ruusunmarjayogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la rhubarbe
hr: Jogurti od rabarbare
hu: Rebarbarás joghurtok
it: Yogurt alla rhubarba
lt: Rabarbarų jogurtai, Jogurtai su rabarbariaus
nl: Rabarberyogurt, Rabarberyogurts
pt: Iogurtes de ruibarbo
ro: Iaurturi cu rubarbă

en: Banana yogurts
de: Bananenjoghurt
es: Yogures con plátano
fi: Banaanijogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la banane
hr: Jogurti od banane
hu: Banános joghurtok
it: Yogurt alla banana
lt: Bananiniai jogurtai, Jogurtai su bananais
nl: Yoghurt met banaan
pt: Iogurtes de banana
ro: Iaurturi cu banane

en: Fig yogurts, Figs yogurts
de: Feigenjoghurt
fr: Yaourts aux figues
hr: Jogurti od smokava
it: Yogurt al fico
lt: Figų jogurtai, Jogurtai su figomis
nl: Yoghurt met vijg
pt: Iogurtes de figo
ro: Iaurturi cu smochine

en: Grapefruit yogurts
fr: Yaourts au pamplemousse
hr: Jogurti od grejpa
lt: Greipfrutų jogurtai, Jogurtai su greipfrutais
pt: Iogurtes de toranja

en: Kiwifruit yogurts, Kiwi yogurts
de: Kiwi-Joghurt
es: Yogures de kiwi
fr: Yaourts au kiwi
hr: Jogurti od kivija
hu: Kiwis joghurtok
it: Yogurt al kiwi
lt: Kivių jogurtai, Jogurtai su kiviais
nl: Kiwiyoghurt, Kiwiyoghurts, Yoghurt met kiwi, Yoghurts met kiwi
pt: Iogurtes de kiwi
ro: Iaurturi cu kiwi

en: Coconut yogurts
de: Kokos-Joghurt
es: Yogures de coco
fi: Kookosjogurtit
fr: Yaourts à la noix de coco
hr: Kokosovi jogurti
hu: Kókusztdiós joghurtok
it: Yogurt al cocco
lt: Kokosiniai jogurtai, Jogurtai su kokosais
nl: Yoghurt met kokos
pt: Iogurtes de coco
ro: Iaurturi cu nucă de cocos

en: Hazelnut yogurts
fi: Hasselpähkinäjogurtit
fr: Yaourts aux noisettes, Yaourt aux noisettes
hr: Jogurti od lješnjaka
it: Yogurt alla nocciola
lt: Lazdyno riešutų jogurtai, Jogurtai su lazdynais
nl: Hazelnootyoghurt, Hazelnootyoghurts, Yoghurt met hazelnoot
pt: Iogurtes de avelã
tr: Fındıklı yoğurt